Hawaii statutes.
§466-42 Peer review oversight committee.
(a) The board shall establish a peer review oversight committee for the
purpose of:

(1) Monitoring sponsoring organizations to ensure
that peer reviews are being conducted and reported in accordance with standards
for performing and reporting on peer reviews adopted by the American Institute
of Certified Public Accountants Peer Review Board;

(2) Reviewing the policies and procedures of
sponsoring organization applicants as to their conformity with the peer review
standards of any applicable peer review organization and this part; and

(3) Reporting to the board on the conclusions and
recommendations reached as a result of performing the functions in paragraphs
(1) and (2).

(b) Except to the extent otherwise required
under this section and section 466-41(b), information concerning a specific
firm or reviewer obtained by the peer review oversight committee during
oversight activities shall be confidential and shall not be subject to
discovery, pursuant to section 466-32, and reports submitted to the board by
the peer review oversight committee shall not contain information concerning
specific firms or reviewers. Members of the peer review oversight committee
shall be required to execute confidentiality statements for the sponsoring
organization that they oversee.

(c) Effective January 1, 2013, the peer review
oversight committee shall consist of three individuals who hold permits to
practice under section 466-7. No member of the peer review oversight committee
shall be a current member of the board, the Hawaii Society of Certified Public
Accountants Peer Review or Professional Ethics Committees, or the American
Institute of Certified Public Accountants Professional Ethics Executive
Committee. The members shall have significant experience with attest
engagements and currently be in the practice of public accountancy at the
partner or equivalent level. The member's firm shall have received a report
with a rating of pass or an unmodified opinion from its last peer review.

(d) The peer review oversight committee shall
make an annual recommendation to the board as to the qualifications of an
approved sponsoring organization to continue as an approved sponsoring
organization on the basis of the results of the following procedures:

(1) Where the sponsoring organization is:

(A) The American Institute of Certified
Public Accountants;

(B) A state certified public accountant
society, including the Hawaii Society of Certified Public Accountants, fully
involved in administering the American Institute of Certified Public
Accountants peer review program; or

(C) The public company accounting oversight
board,

the peer review oversight committee shall review
the published reports of the entity or the entity's successor to determine
whether there is an acceptable level of oversight; and

(2) Where the sponsoring organization is other than
any organization listed in paragraph (1), the peer review oversight committee
shall perform the following functions:

(A) At least one member of the peer review
oversight committee shall attend at least one meeting of the sponsoring
organization's peer review committee; and

(B) During these visits, the peer review
oversight committee members shall:

(i) Meet with the organization's peer review
committee during the committee's consideration of peer review documents;

(ii) Evaluate the organization's procedures for
administering the peer review program;

(iii) Examine, on the basis of a random
selection, a number of reviews performed by the organization to include, at a
minimum, a review of the report on the peer review, the firm's response to the
matters discussed, the sponsoring organization's letter of acceptance outlining
any additional corrective or monitoring procedures, and the required technical
documentation maintained by the sponsoring organization on the selected
reviews; and

(iv) Expand the examination of peer review
documents if significant deficiencies, problems, or inconsistencies are
encountered during the analysis of the materials.

(e) In the evaluation of policies and
procedures of sponsoring organization applicants, the peer review oversight
committee shall:

(1) Examine the policies as drafted by the applicant
to determine whether the policies provide reasonable assurance of conforming to
the standards for peer reviews;

(2) Evaluate the procedures proposed by the applicant
to determine whether:

(A) Assigned reviewers are appropriately
qualified to perform the review for the specific firm;

(B) Reviewers are provided with appropriate
materials;

(C) The applicant has provided for
consultation with the reviewers on problems arising during the review and that
specified occurrences requiring consultation are outlined;

(D) The applicant has provided for the assessment
of the results of the review; and

(E) The applicant has provided for an
independent report acceptance body that considers and accepts the reports of
the review and requires corrective actions by firms with significant
deficiencies; and

(3) Make recommendations to the board as to approval
of the applicant as a sponsoring organization.

(f) Annually, the peer review oversight
committee shall provide the board with a report on the continued reliability of
sponsoring organizations' peer reviews. The peer review oversight committee
report shall provide reasonable assurance that peer reviews are being conducted
and reported on consistently and in accordance with the Standards for
Performing and Reporting on Peer Review adopted by the American Institute of
Certified Public Accountants. A summary of oversight visits shall be included
with the annual report.

(g) The members of the peer review oversight
committee shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for
necessary expenses, including travel expenses, that are incurred in the
performance of their duties.

(h) No member of the peer review oversight
committee shall bear any civil liability for any action taken as a member of
the peer review oversight committee in furtherance of the purposes for which
the peer review oversight committee was established.[L 2012, c 324, pt of §1;
am L 2016, c 145, §6]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next